Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1220.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.510 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The interchange of Interstate 35 and Blue Bell Road in Springer,
Carter County, shall be designated as the “Terry Walker Memorial
Interchange”. The Department of Transportation shall cause suitable
permanent markers bearing that name to be placed at the interchange.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON AERONAUTICS AND TRANSPORTATION
February 9, 2026 - DO PASS





SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1220 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)